Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 8 Georgia Criminal Justice Improvement Council

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was based on Ga. L. 1981, p. 819, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 431, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 28; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 28.

28-8-1 through 28-8-3.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 819, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 431, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 28; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 28; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 681, § 1/HB 220, effective July 1, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 681, § 1/HB 220 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective July 1, 2007.